Wyoming, session 2025, HB0169.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-11-105(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xlvi) and 39-13-102(k) are amended to read:

39-11-105. Exemptions.

HB0169

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0653
(a) The following property is exempt from property
taxation:

(xlvi) A portion of a residential property as a
homeowner tax exemption as provided in this paragraph. The
following shall apply to this exemption:

(A) The amount of the exemption under this
paragraph shall be fifty percent (50%) of the fair market
value of a residential property, provided that the
exemption shall only apply to the first one million dollars
($1,000,000.00) of the fair market value of the residential
property;

(B) As used in this paragraph, "residential
property" means a structure intended for human habitation
including a house, modular home, mobile home, townhouse or
condominium that is a privately owned single family
dwelling unit;

(C) The county treasurer for each county
shall keep accurate records of the reduction in tax
revenues caused by the homeowner tax exemption provided by
HB0169

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0653
this paragraph for the county and for each governmental
entity for which notification is made pursuant to W.S.
39‑13‑104(k) and shall report that information to the
department. The department shall compile and verify the
information received from each county and shall verify any
reductions in the distribution of mill levies to the school
foundation program account under W.S. 21-13-303. Subject to
appropriation of funds by the legislature, the department
shall distribute verified amounts to each county treasurer
for distribution as provided in W.S. 39‑13‑111 in an amount
necessary to compensate each government entity for fifty
percent (50%) of the reduction in tax revenues due to the
exemption under this paragraph. If funds appropriated by
the legislature for distribution under this subparagraph
are insufficient to complete all necessary distributions,
there is appropriated to the department of revenue from the
legislative stabilization reserve account an amount equal
to the amount by which legislative appropriations are
insufficient to make distributions necessary under this
subparagraph for the current tax year. The department shall
transfer this legislative stabilization reserve account
appropriation to each county for distribution to each
government entity in an amount necessary to compensate each
HB0169

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0653
government entity for fifty percent (50%) of the reduction
in tax revenues. No appropriation from the legislative
stabilization reserve account shall be authorized under
this paragraph after June 30, 2027 and total appropriations
from the legislative stabilization reserve account under
this subparagraph shall not exceed one hundred million
dollars ($100,000,000.00). If funds appropriated by the
legislature for distribution under this subparagraph are
insufficient to complete all necessary distributions, the
department shall distribute funds to each government entity
on a pro rata basis;

(D) The exemption under this paragraph
shall not apply for tax year 2027 and thereafter.

39-13-102. Administration; confidentiality.

(k) On or before September 1, county assessors shall
certify the exemptions granted pursuant to W.S.
39-11-105(a)(xxiv) and (xlvi) to the department. On or
before October 1 the state treasurer out of funds
appropriated for that purpose shall reimburse each county
treasurer for the amount of taxes which would have been
HB0169

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0653
collected if the property was not exempt. The county
treasurer shall distribute the revenue to each governmental
entity in the actual amount of taxes lost due to the
exemption.

Section 2. The exemption provided by this act shall
first apply to the tax year beginning January 1, 2025.

Section 3.

(a) The legislature finds that:

(i) The property tax relief in this bill is
intended to provide property tax relief in tax years 2025
and 2026;

(ii) Nothing in this act is intended to be or
shall be construed as substantially the same as any
proposed law offered for initiative as provided in W.S.
22-24-319(a)(iii), including the "people's initiative to
limit property tax in Wyoming through a homeowner's
property tax exemption."

HB0169

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0653
Section 4. There is appropriated one hundred
twenty-five million dollars ($125,000,000.00) from the
general fund to the department of revenue for the purposes
of reimbursing government entities, including school
districts, for losses in revenue resulting from the
homeowner tax exemption as provided in this act. This
appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the
effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2027. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law on June 30, 2027. It is the intent of the
legislature that this appropriation not be included in the
department's standard budget for the immediately succeeding
fiscal biennium.

Section 5. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0169